Georgia, session 2025_26, HB435.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Code Section 16-12-100 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to sexual
exploitation of children, reporting violation, civil forfeiture, and penalties, is amended by
revising subsection (d) as follows:
"(d) The provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section shall not apply to:
(1) The activities of law enforcement and prosecution agencies in the investigation and
prosecution of criminal offenses;
(2) Legitimate medical, scientific, or educational activities; or
(3) Any person who creates or possesses a visual medium depicting only himself or
herself engaged in sexually explicit conduct. ; or
H. B. 435
- 1 -

LC 48 1410
(4) Any staff member of the Division of Family and Children Services in the
performance of his or her official duties."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 435
- 2 -